Idaho, session 2026, H0910.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 58, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 16, Title 58, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 16
MANAGED RECREATION OPPORTUNITIES ON ENDOWMENT LAND
58-1601. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The legislature finds
that:
(a) Upon statehood, Idaho was endowed with certain land to be held and
used exclusively for the purposes provided by the admission act, in such
a manner as the legislature of the state may provide, thereby creating
a "sacred-trust" between the general government, as trustor, the state,
as trustee, and the various beneficiaries;
(b) Such lands became known as endowment lands and are actively man-
aged by the Idaho department of lands, under the direction of the board
of land commissioners, in accordance with its constitutional mandate
to "secure the maximum long term financial return to the institution to
which granted", of which there are nine (9), the most prominent being
public schools;
(c) To generate revenue, endowment lands are leased for various pur-
poses, such as timber harvests, grazing, and commercial uses, and are
generally open to the public, free of charge, provided such public ac-
cess does not interfere with the execution of a valid, existing lease,
or is not otherwise incompatible with the trust purposes of the endow-
ment land;
(d) Idaho law requires that all state-owned lands classified as chiefly
valuable for forestry, reforestation, recreation, and watershed pro-
tection be set aside as state forests, thereby ensuring that endowment
lands classified as such, while they may be reclassified from time to
time, provide future beneficiaries with suitable revenue-generating
land while also ensuring ecologically sensitive areas and rural commu-
nities with single-source watersheds are protected;
(e) The Idaho park and recreation board and the Idaho department of
parks and recreation successfully manage state parks, trails, and other
attractions throughout every region of Idaho, giving them the ability,
expertise, and experience necessary to design, construct, operate,


maintain, and administer public recreation infrastructure and activi-
ties within and across Idaho;
(f) In 1989, the Idaho legislature recognized "that in order to obtain
the maximum long-term benefits to the people of Idaho, it is necessary
for lands of outstanding park and recreation potential to be acquired
and incorporated into the state park system in the most economical man-
ner possible.";
(g) The department of parks and recreation, under the direction of the
park board, is statutorily charged with acquiring or leasing areas of
scenic beauty, recreational utility, or historic, archaeological, or
scientific interest to ensure that the health, happiness, availability
of recreational opportunities, and overall wholesome enjoyment of life
by the people will be furthered; and
(h) Both boards and departments are uniquely positioned to collabora-
tively fulfill the land board's constitutional mandate, meet statutory
requirements, and promote the park board's duties all while ensuring
future generations of beneficiaries and citizens have access to endow-
ment lands, the outdoors, and a healthy environment.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Maximize the long-term benefit to the endowment beneficiaries by
providing a variety of long-term, consistent revenue sources;
(b) Protect traditional uses of endowment land and valid, existing
rights;
(c) Conserve existing public access to lands historically open to the
public; and
(d) Preserve, establish, and promote outdoor recreation and education
opportunities.
58-1602. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Endowment land" means any and all land granted or acquired pur-
suant to sections 4 through 14 of the Idaho admission act, including in-lieu
and indemnity lands and such other lands as may have been acquired by the
state through the exchange of such lands or the sale of such lands and pur-
chase of additional lands, and such other lands that may have been acquired
by the state board of land commissioners through gift, grant, or donation
pursuant to section 58-133(1), Idaho Code.
(2) "IDL fee" means the fee set by and paid to the Idaho department of
lands for each managed recreation opportunity.
(3) "IDPR fee" means the fee that may be set by the Idaho department of
parks and recreation for a managed recreation opportunity.
(4) "Managed recreation opportunity" means a specific, defined site or
area of endowment land that is developed and operated for fee-based recre-
ation opportunities, including the associated infrastructure. A managed
recreation opportunity may include providing, promoting, and expanding
outdoor education and research opportunities, similar to the McCall outdoor
science school. A managed recreation opportunity may also include but is not
limited to:
(a) Camp, tent, recreational vehicle, yurt, park-and-ski, and picnic
sites;
(b) Bike, equestrian, off-highway vehicle, and snowmobile parks; and


(c) Development of the land for hiking, backpacking, fishing, hunting,
and other such recreational uses as may be desired by the departments.
(5) "Managed recreation plan" or "plan" means a site-specific develop-
ment and management plan containing site-specific terms for a managed recre-
ation opportunity.
(6) "Recreation advisor" means the designated representative from the
department of lands or the designated representative from the department
and parks and recreation who serves as that department's primary point of
contact for managed recreation opportunities established pursuant to this
chapter.
58-1603. MANAGED RECREATION OPPORTUNITIES. (1) A managed recreation
opportunity shall be approved by the board of land commissioners and the park
and recreation board prior to its implementation.
(2) A managed recreation opportunity shall not terminate, effectively
terminate, or interfere with, harm, or impede any bona fide right or valid,
existing right that precedes the use of the land for a managed recreation op-
portunity without written consent of the affected right-holder.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter only, any lease or other land use
agreement executed for a managed recreation opportunity shall not be consid-
ered a disposal of endowment land subject to requirements regarding conflict
auctions.
58-1604. DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENTS. (1) The director of the department
of lands and the director of the department of parks and recreation, and the
boards, departments, and recreation advisors associated therewith, shall
collaboratively work together to execute the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department of lands and the department of parks and recreation
shall:
(a) Mutually identify endowment lands that can be developed to offer
managed recreation opportunities to generate revenue, protect endow-
ment land assets, and promote public recreational values;
(b) Appoint a recreation advisor; and
(c) To the maximum extent possible, facilitate multiple simultaneous
leases or uses on endowment lands to maximize revenue, including work-
ing with existing lessees or right-holders, if any, to ensure that a
managed recreation opportunity does not substantially interfere with,
harm, or impede any bona fide right or valid, existing right.
(3) The department of lands shall:
(a) Compile, keep, periodically update, and make available to the de-
partment of parks and recreation an inventory of endowment lands from
which the departments may identify and select mutually agreeable lands
for managed recreation opportunities;
(b) Provide technical assistance on the development, design, con-
struction, implementation, maintenance, and management of the managed
recreation opportunity; and
(c) Provide guidance for each managed recreation opportunity to
assist, coordinate, and consult with the department of parks and recre-
ation.
(4) The department of parks and recreation shall:


(a) Design, manage, maintain, operate, and administer all managed
recreation opportunities on endowment lands;
(b) Prepare, solicit, contract, and procure goods and services nec-
essary to construct, develop, maintain, operate, and manage managed
recreation opportunities; and
(c) Incorporate all managed recreation opportunities into its regular
operations and management, including use of its reservation system and
concessionaires or vendors.
58-1605. MANAGED RECREATION PLAN. (1) The departments shall develop a
managed recreation plan after identifying endowment land suitable for a man-
aged recreation opportunity.
(2) The management plan shall include, at a minimum:
(a) An explanation of the recreation opportunity sought to be developed
and the need for it in the community;
(b) The projected monetary benefit to the beneficiary and impact to ex-
isting users of the land, if any; and
(c) Site-specific terms for the managed recreation opportunity that
may include provisions governing use, construction, maintenance, oper-
ation, marketing, funding, revenue distribution, and other such terms
as the boards may deem necessary for the respective managed recreation
opportunity.
(3) Once a managed recreation plan is completed, the departments shall
present the plan to their respective board for review and approval. The plan
shall be approved by:
(a) The board of land commissioners if it finds that:
(i) The IDL fee associated with the managed recreation oppor-
tunity is reasonably likely to compensate the beneficiary in an
amount equal to the fair market value for a similar recreation op-
portunity on the specific area of endowment land sought to be used
for the managed recreation opportunity; and
(ii) The managed recreation opportunity will not actually and
substantially interfere with, harm, or impede any bona fide right
or valid, existing right that precedes the use of the land for a
managed recreation opportunity, unless written consent of the af-
fected right-holder is obtained and presented to the board; and
(b) The park and recreation board if it finds that:
(i) The managed recreation opportunity aligns with its strategic
plan and that it will preserve, protect, or promote the overall en-
joyment of life for the people through outdoor recreation and re-
source stewardship; and
(ii) The managed recreation opportunity will not actually and
substantially interfere with, harm, or impede any bona fide right
or valid, existing right that precedes the use of the land for a
managed recreation opportunity, unless written consent of the af-
fected right-holder is obtained and presented to the board.
(4) Upon the approval of the plan by both boards, the departments shall
implement the plan and take the necessary actions to open the managed recre-
ation opportunity to the public as soon as is practicable.


(5) The directors of the departments may use any power and duty granted
to them pursuant to Idaho law to develop a managed recreation opportunity or
associated plan or to otherwise effectuate the provisions of this chapter.
58-1606. REVENUE GENERATION AND DISTRIBUTION. (1) For each managed
recreation opportunity, the department of lands shall set an IDL fee.
(a) The IDL fee shall be based on the fair market value for a similar
recreation opportunity on the specific area of endowment land sought to
be used for the managed recreation opportunity.
(b) When setting the fee, the department of lands shall consider mul-
tiple fair market factors, including local and regional recreation mar-
ket conditions and consistency with fiduciary obligations to endowment
beneficiaries and with the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The IDL fee may be periodically reviewed and adjusted as the board
of land commissioners may see fit but no more frequently than on an an-
nual basis. Prior to adjusting the IDL fee, the land board shall consult
with the park and recreation board and shall attempt to adjust the fee to
a mutually agreeable amount but does not need the park board's consent
prior to adjusting the IDL fee.
(2) The department of parks and recreation shall remit all IDL fees to
the department of lands at the end of each fiscal year for deposit into the
earnings reserve fund of the respective endowment beneficiary for which the
land was used for a managed recreation opportunity.
(3) The department of parks and recreation may charge an IDPR fee.
(a) The IDPR fee shall be determined according to the fee schedule ap-
proved by the park and recreation board.
(b) IDPR fees shall be deposited into the park and recreation fund es-
tablished in section 67-4225, Idaho Code, and used solely by the depart-
ment of parks and recreation for managed recreation opportunities.
(4) The department of parks and recreation may utilize funds, as appli-
cable, provided pursuant to:
(a) Section 67-7126(4), Idaho Code, for off-highway vehicle opportuni-
ties and related facilities and management; and
(b) Section 67-7106(1)(c), Idaho Code, for snowmobile opportunities
and related facilities and management.
(5) Any proceeds from the operation of a managed recreation opportunity
shall be deposited into the park and recreation fund to be used by the direc-
tor of the department of parks and recreation, subject to legislative appro-
priation, solely for the purposes provided for by this chapter, along with
such other moneys as may be provided by legislative appropriation to further
effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
(a) IDL fees shall not be considered proceeds.
(b) Up to fifteen percent (15%) of the proceeds may be used for admin-
istrative costs related to managed recreation opportunities, includ-
ing providing compensation to the departments' recreation advisors for
their work effectuating the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The remaining proceeds may be used by the department of parks and
recreation to cover the costs of developing, designing, constructing,
implementing, maintaining, managing, and operating managed recreation


opportunities, acquiring managed recreation opportunities, and other-
wise implementing the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Such proceeds shall not be used toward:
(i) Expenses incurred to manage endowment lands for purposes or
uses other than a managed recreation opportunity; or
(ii) Expenses incurred to manage lands under the direction or con-
trol of the department of parks and recreation for purposes or uses
other than a managed recreation opportunity.
(6) Any proceeds from managed recreation opportunities over five hun-
dred thousand dollars ($500,000) that remain unencumbered in the fund at the
end of each fiscal year shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the de-
partments as follows:
(a) Fifty percent (50%), along with any interest collected on such mon-
eys, shall be deposited into the park and recreation fund established in
section 67-4225, Idaho Code; and
(b) Fifty percent (50%), along with any interest collected on such mon-
eys, shall be deposited in the earnings reserve fund of the respective
endowment beneficiary for which the land was used for a managed recre-
ation opportunity.
58-1607. REPORTING BY THE DEPARTMENTS. (1) No later than June 30 of
each year, beginning in 2027, the directors of the department of lands and
department of parks and recreation shall jointly prepare and submit to the
governor and the legislature an annual report concerning endowment lands
used for managed recreation opportunities and the departments' performance
administering such lands, the managed recreation opportunities associated
with such lands, and the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The departments' annual report shall, at a minimum:
(a) Provide a detailed accounting of all active endowment land leases
that are categorized for recreation purposes, including the total
acreage under such lease, the lease terms, and the revenue generated
thereunder;
(b) Provide the inventory of endowment lands required to be kept by this
chapter and an overview of potential future managed recreation opportu-
nities, including total acreage, recreation opportunity, and potential
revenue;
(c) Provide a detailed accounting of each active managed recreation op-
portunity that includes:
(i) The total proceeds generated at that managed recreation op-
portunity;
(ii) The associated IDL fee amount and the total distribution, or
anticipated distribution, to the endowment beneficiaries; and
(iii) The total expenditures related to that managed recreation
opportunity;
(d) Provide an overview of the total proceeds generated by all managed
recreation opportunities throughout the state, including the antici-
pated distributions to the departments pursuant to section 58-1606(5),
Idaho Code;


(e) Provide comprehensive operational details for both departments for
the preceding fiscal year, including budgetary expenditures, staffing,
and progress toward mutually planned strategic milestones; and
(f) Be made publicly available on the respective departments' official
websites.
(3) The department of lands may request for its accounting purposes, no
more frequently than once per fiscal quarter, and the department of parks and
recreation shall provide, within ten (10) business days of receiving such
request in writing, an accurate report containing the information required
by subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this section.
58-1608. APPLICABILITY. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
require, permit, or approve the transfer of endowment land from the depart-
ment of lands to the department of parks and recreation or to otherwise di-
vest the state board of land commissioners of title to or management author-
ity over endowment lands, regardless of the endowment land's use as a man-
aged recreation opportunity. Endowment land may be disposed of or otherwise
transferred to the department of parks and recreation only pursuant to a sale
or exchange made in accordance with applicable law.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.